tsts-nov19/apertium-tg-fa.tg.dix.xml
    <pardef n="/будан__vbser"> <!-- to be -->
    <!-- ҳастам ҳасти ҳаст аст ҳастем ҳастанд ҳастед -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳастам</l>
	  <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳасти</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR"> <!-- this is is one acceptable form -->
        <p>
          <l>ҳаст</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p> <!-- this is the other acceptable form -->
          <l>аст</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳастем</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳастанд</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳастед</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>бошам</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>боши</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>бошад</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>бошим</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>бошид</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>бошанд</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
 
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>будам</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>буди</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>буд</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>будем</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>будед</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>буданд</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="до/штан__vbhaver"> <!-- to have -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>рам</l> <!-- i have -->
	  <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ри</l> <!-- you have -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>рад</l> <!-- he has -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>рем</l> <!-- we have -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ранд</l> <!-- they have -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ред</l> <!-- you have -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>штам</l> <!-- i had -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>шти</l> <!-- you had -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>шт</l> <!-- he had -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>штем</l> <!-- we had -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>

     <e>
       <p>
         <l>штанд</l> <!-- they had -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>

     <e>
       <p>
         <l>штед</l> <!-- you had -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ра/фтан__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вид</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>в</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>фтим</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>фтам</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>фтид</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>фти</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>фтанд</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>фт</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вим</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вам</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вид</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ви</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ванд</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вад</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вим</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вам</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вид</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ви</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ванд</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вад</l>
          <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="доштан"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>до</i><par n="до/штан__vbhaver"/></e>
